New York, session 2025-2026, S5067.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 317 of the education law, as added by chapter 170 2 of the laws of 1994, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 317. [General education development] Excelsior diploma exam. 4 Notwithstanding any provision of law, no fee shall be established for 5 admission to the [general education development] Excelsior diploma exam. 6 § 2. Section 305 of the education law is amended by adding a new 7 subdivision 63 to read as follows: 8 63. The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations to change 9 the name of the state high school equivalency diploma, as established 10 pursuant to section 100.7 of title eight of the New York codes, rules 11 and regulations, to the Excelsior diploma. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08757-04-6 S. 5067--B 2 1 § 3. Subdivision 19 of section 2 of the correction law, as amended by 2 chapter 322 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 3 19. "Vocational and skills training facility" means a correctional 4 facility designated by the commissioner to provide a vocational and 5 skills training program ("VAST") to incarcerated individuals who need 6 such service before they participate in a work release program. The VAST 7 facility shall provide intensive assessment, counseling, job search 8 assistance and where appropriate academic and vocational instruction to 9 program participants. Such assistance may include an assessment of any 10 incarcerated individual's education attainment level and skills apti- 11 tudes; career counseling and exploration; the development of a compre- 12 hensive instructional plan including identification of educational and 13 training needs that may extend beyond the date of entry into work 14 release; instructional programs including [GED] Excelsior diploma prepa- 15 ration or post-secondary instruction as appropriate; occupational skills 16 training; life skills training; employment readiness including workplace 17 behavior; and job search assistance. The department and the department 18 of labor shall jointly develop activities providing career counseling, 19 job search assistance, and job placement services for participants. 20 Nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to modify the eligi- 21 bility requirements provided by law applicable to incarcerated individ- 22 uals participating in a work release program. 23 § 4. The seventh undesignated paragraph of subdivision a of section 24 9-151 of the administrative code of the city of New York, as added by 25 local law number 168 of the city of New York for the year 2017, is 26 amended to read as follows: 27 [High school equivalency diploma] Excelsior diploma test. The term 28 "[high school equivalency diplomacy] Excelsior diploma test" means any 29 test offered by the New York state education department for the purpose 30 of establishing the equivalent of a high school diploma, including, but 31 not limited to, a general education development test or the test assess- 32 ing secondary completion. 33 § 5. Subdivision a of section 21-408 of the administrative code of the 34 city of New York, as added by local law number 86 of the city of New 35 York for the year 2018, is amended to read as follows: 36 a. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, the term "test 37 assessing secondary completion (TASC)" means the [New York state high 38 school equivalency] Excelsior diploma test which replaced the General 39 Education Development (GED) as the primary pathway to [a New York state 40 high school equivalency] an Excelsior diploma. 41 § 6. Subdivision b and paragraph 4 of subdivision c of section 21-703 42 of the administrative code of the city of New York, as added by local 43 law number 23 of the city of New York for the year 2003, are amended to 44 read as follows: 45 b. If an applicant, recipient or participant who is eligible for 46 education or training as set forth in subdivision c of this section 47 expresses an intention or preference to the agency to enroll in educa- 48 tion, training or vocational rehabilitation, or if an applicant's, 49 recipient's or participant's assessment indicates that [he or she] such 50 applicant, recipient or participant lacks basic literacy, a secondary 51 school diploma, or [a general equivalency] an Excelsior diploma [(GED)] 52 or otherwise indicates that education, training or vocational rehabili- 53 tation would enhance the individual's ability to obtain and maintain 54 employment, then the agency shall offer such applicant, recipient or 55 participant the opportunity to enroll in an approved program or S. 5067--B 3 1 programs, provided that such approved program or programs can be classi- 2 fied as countable work activities. 3 4. An applicant, recipient or participant is eligible to participate 4 in [a GED] an Excelsior diploma program if [s/he] such applicant, recip- 5 ient or participant has attained basic literacy but has not received a 6 secondary school diploma. 7 § 7. The twentieth undesignated paragraph of subdivision a of section 8 21-902.1 of the administrative code of the city of New York, as amended 9 by local law number 145 of the city of New York for the year 2016, is 10 amended to read as follows: 11 Test assessing secondary completion (TASC). The term "test assessing 12 secondary completion (TASC)" means the [New York state high school 13 equivalency] Excelsior diploma test which replaced the general education 14 development examination as the primary pathway to [a New York state high 15 school equivalency] an Excelsior diploma. 16 § 8. The eleventh undesignated paragraph of subdivision a of section 17 21-924 of the administrative code of the city of New York, as added by 18 local law number 21 of the city of New York for the year 2024, is 19 amended to read as follows: 20 [High school equivalency] Excelsior diploma test. The term "[high 21 school equivalency diploma] Excelsior diploma test" means any test that 22 the New York state education department offers for the purpose of estab- 23 lishing the equivalent of a high school diploma, including, but not 24 limited to, a general education development test or the test assessing 25 secondary completion. 26 § 9. Paragraph 5 of subdivision a of section 9-137 of the adminis- 27 trative code of the city of New York, as amended by chapter 322 of the 28 laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 29 5. Educational background as self-reported by incarcerated individuals 30 after admission to the custody of the department, categorized as follows 31 based on the highest level of education achieved: no high school diploma 32 or [general education] Excelsior diploma, [a general education] an 33 Excelsior diploma, a high school diploma, some college but no degree, an 34 associate's degree, a bachelor's degree, or a post-collegiate degree. 35 § 10. Subparagraph (iv) of paragraph (d) of subdivision 1 of section 36 803 of the correction law, as amended by section 1 of part EE of chapter 37 56 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 38 (iv) Such merit time allowance may be granted when an incarcerated 39 individual successfully participates in the work and treatment program 40 assigned pursuant to section eight hundred five of this article and when 41 such incarcerated individual obtains [a general equivalency] an Excels- 42 ior diploma, an alcohol and substance abuse treatment certificate, a 43 vocational trade certificate following at least six months of vocational 44 programming, at least eighteen credits in a program registered by the 45 state education department from a degree-granting higher education 46 institution or performs at least four hundred hours of service as part 47 of a community work crew. The commissioner may designate additional 48 programs and achievements for which merit time may be granted. 49 Such allowance shall be withheld for any serious disciplinary infrac- 50 tion or upon a judicial determination that the person, while an incar- 51 cerated individual, commenced or continued a civil action, proceeding or 52 claim that was found to be frivolous as defined in subdivision (c) of 53 section eight thousand three hundred three-a of the civil practice law 54 and rules, or an order of a federal court pursuant to rule 11 of the 55 federal rules of civil procedure imposing sanctions in an action S. 5067--B 4 1 commenced by a person, while an incarcerated individual, against a state 2 agency, officer or employee. 3 § 11. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 58 of the civil 4 service law, as amended by section 4 of part C of chapter 55 of the laws 5 of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 6 (b) they are a high school graduate or a holder of [a high school 7 equivalency] an Excelsior diploma, issued by an education department of 8 any of the states of the United States or a holder of a comparable 9 diploma issued by any commonwealth, territory or possession of the 10 United States or by the Canal Zone or a holder of a report from the 11 United States armed forces certifying their successful completion of the 12 tests of general educational development, high school level; 13 § 12. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 of section 352-a of the educa- 14 tion law, as amended by section 1 of part II of chapter 56 of the laws 15 of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 16 (b) To be eligible to receive such nomination and scholarship, the 17 applicant must be a resident of the state. For purposes of this section, 18 a state resident shall be defined as a person who has resided in the 19 state of New York for a period of at least one year prior to the time of 20 nomination, is a graduate or within one year of graduation from an 21 approved high school or has attained [a New York state high school 22 equivalency] an Excelsior diploma or its equivalent as determined by the 23 commissioner. 24 § 13. Clause (ii) of subparagraph 8 of paragraph h of subdivision 2 of 25 section 355 of the education law, as amended by chapter 669 of the laws 26 of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 27 (ii) attended an approved New York state program for [general equiv- 28 alency] an Excelsior diploma exam preparation, received [a general 29 equivalency] an Excelsior diploma issued within New York state and 30 applied for attendance at an institution or educational unit of the 31 state university within five years of receiving [a general equivalency] 32 an Excelsior diploma issued within New York state; or 33 § 14. Subdivision 2 of section 610 of the education law, as added by 34 chapter 425 of the laws of 1988, is amended to read as follows: 35 2. Eligibility for scholarship. Liberty scholarships shall be awarded 36 to persons: 37 a. who have applied for such scholarship; 38 b. who have graduated from a secondary school located within New York 39 state or have received [a high school equivalency] an Excelsior diploma 40 from New York state; 41 c. who have not attained the age of twenty-two as of June thirtieth 42 prior to the academic year for which the initial award is received and 43 who are undergraduate students receiving aid under this chapter for the 44 first time during academic year nineteen hundred ninety-one--nineteen 45 hundred ninety-two or thereafter; 46 d. who have enrolled in an approved program in a degree-granting 47 institution located in New York state within twenty-four months of the 48 date that the recipient graduated from secondary school or received [a 49 high school equivalency] an Excelsior diploma, provided that those 50 students who are temporarily unable to avail themselves of the award due 51 to illness, military service or other causes in accordance with rules of 52 the board of regents prior to receipt of the first payment of an award 53 may be granted a leave of absence pursuant to regulations of the trus- 54 tees of the higher education services corporation; 55 e. who satisfy the requirements of section six hundred sixty-one of 56 this [chapter] title; S. 5067--B 5 1 f. who retain good academic standing as defined by the commissioner; 2 and 3 g. who qualify for a scholarship pursuant to subdivision six of this 4 section. 5 § 15. Subparagraph 7 of paragraph b of subdivision 1 of section 612 of 6 the education law, as added by chapter 425 of the laws of 1988, is 7 amended to read as follows: 8 (7) the degree to which the institution proposes to cooperate with 9 school districts and not-for-profit community based organizations to 10 provide services and insure continuity of such services until such 11 students graduate from high school or receive [a high school equivalen- 12 cy] an Excelsior diploma. 13 § 16. Clause (b) of subparagraph (ii) of paragraph a of subdivision 5 14 of section 661 of the education law, as amended by chapter 26 of the 15 laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 16 (b) attended an approved New York state program for [a state high 17 school equivalency] an Excelsior diploma, received [a state high school 18 equivalency] an Excelsior diploma and applied for attendance at the 19 institution of higher education for the undergraduate study for which an 20 award is sought within five years of receiving [a state high school 21 equivalency] an Excelsior diploma; or 22 § 17. Subdivision 2 of section 679-g of the education law, as added by 23 section 1 of part C of chapter 56 of the laws of 2015, is amended to 24 read as follows: 25 2. Eligibility. To be eligible for an award pursuant to this section, 26 an applicant shall: (a) have graduated from a high school located in New 27 York state or attended an approved New York state program for [a state 28 high school equivalency] an Excelsior diploma and received such [high 29 school equivalency] diploma; (b) have graduated and obtained an under- 30 graduate degree from a college or university with its headquarters 31 located in New York state in or after the two thousand fourteen--fifteen 32 academic year; (c) apply for this program within two years of obtaining 33 such degree; (d) be a participant in a federal income-driven repayment 34 plan whose payment amount is generally ten percent of discretionary 35 income; (e) have income of less than fifty thousand dollars; (f) comply 36 with subdivisions three and five of section six hundred sixty-one of 37 this part; and (g) work in New York state, if employed. For purposes of 38 this program, "income" shall be the total adjusted gross income of the 39 applicant and the applicant's spouse, if applicable. 40 § 18. Subdivision 5 of section 3622-a of the education law, as amended 41 by chapter 422 of the laws of 2004, is amended to read as follows: 42 5. Transportation of pupils during the school day to and from programs 43 at a board of cooperative educational services or to or from approved 44 shared programs at other school districts, which programs may lead to a 45 diploma or [a high school equivalency] an Excelsior diploma or to or 46 from career education programs operated within the district; 47 § 19. Subdivision 1 of section 6451 of the education law, as amended 48 by chapter 917 of the laws of 1970, is amended to read as follows: 49 1. To advance the cause of educational opportunity in higher educa- 50 tion, the commissioner may contract with non-public institutions of 51 higher education for the support of special programs for the screening, 52 testing, counseling, tutoring of, and, assistance to, residents of the 53 state who are, (1) graduates of an approved high school or individuals 54 who have attained [a New York state high school equivalency] an Excels- 55 ior diploma or its equivalent, as determined by the commissioner, (2) 56 who have potential for the successful completion of a post secondary S. 5067--B 6 1 program, and (3) are economically and educationally disadvantaged, as 2 defined by the regents. 3 § 20. Subdivision 1 of section 6452 of the education law, as added by 4 chapter 917 of the laws of 1970, is amended to read as follows: 5 1. To provide additional educational opportunity at the state univer- 6 sity of New York and the city university of New York, such institutions 7 shall provide special programs for the screening, testing, counseling, 8 and tutoring of, and assistance to, residents of the state who are, (1) 9 graduates of an approved high school or individuals who have attained [a 10 New York state high school equivalency] an Excelsior diploma or its 11 equivalent, as determined by the commissioner, (2) who have potential 12 for the successful completion of a post secondary program, and (3) are 13 economically and educationally disadvantaged. 14 § 21. Clause 2 of subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 15 and clause 2 of subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 3 of 16 section 6455 of the education law, as amended by chapter 26 of the laws 17 of 2019, are amended to read as follows: 18 (2) attended an approved New York state program for [a state high 19 school equivalency] an Excelsior diploma, received [a state high school 20 equivalency] an Excelsior diploma and applied for attendance at the 21 institution of higher education for the undergraduate study for which an 22 award is sought within five years of receiving [a state high school 23 equivalency] an Excelsior diploma; or 24 (2) attended an approved New York state program for [a state high 25 school equivalency] an Excelsior diploma, received a state [high school 26 equivalency] diploma and applied for attendance at the institution of 27 higher education for the graduate study for which an award is sought 28 within ten years of receiving [a state] an Excelsior [high school equiv- 29 alency] diploma; or 30 § 22. Subdivision 4 of section 532-d of the executive law, as amended 31 by section 5 of part M of chapter 56 of the laws of 2017, is amended to 32 read as follows: 33 4. for a homeless youth whose service plan involves independent 34 living, provide practical assistance in achieving independence, either 35 through direct provision of services or through written agreements with 36 other community and public agencies for the provision of services in the 37 following areas; high school education or [high school equivalency 38 education] an Excelsior diploma; higher education assessment; job train- 39 ing and job placement; counseling; assistance in the development of 40 socialization skills; guidance and assistance in securing housing appro- 41 priate to needs and income; and training in the development of skills 42 necessary for responsible independent living, including but not limited 43 to money and home management, personal care, and health maintenance; and 44 § 23. Subdivision 15 of section 42 of the labor law, as added by 45 section 6 of part E of chapter 389 of the laws of 1997, is amended to 46 read as follows: 47 15. Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, 48 the department shall prepare and submit to the governor, the temporary 49 president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly and the chair of 50 the legislative commission on skills development and vocational educa- 51 tion, an annual evaluation report of this program no later than October 52 thirty-first following the end of the program year. The report shall 53 include a statement of program objectives which identifies outcomes and 54 indicators of the effectiveness of the program. It shall represent the 55 extent to which program activities meet program objectives including, 56 but not limited to, improvements in participants' educational competen- S. 5067--B 7 1 cies and employability skills as measured by accepted testing tools. The 2 basic measures of performance for projects for in-school youth shall be: 3 high school retention, attainment of a high school diploma, enrollment 4 in a post-secondary educational program or vocational skills training 5 program, or attainment of unsubsidized employment. The basic measure of 6 performance for projects for out-of-school youth shall be: improvement 7 in basic academic and vocational skills, return to high school, attain- 8 ment of [a high school equivalency] an Excelsior diploma, enrollment in 9 a post-secondary educational program or vocational skills training 10 program, or attainment of unsubsidized employment. The report shall 11 include a separate count of participants who have participated in the 12 same program model through more than one program cycle. A methodology 13 shall be prescribed which requires collection of post-program informa- 14 tion on program participants including, but not limited to, whether a 15 participant receives a high school degree or its equivalent and subse- 16 quent labor market experience for one year following termination from 17 the program, and the extent to which the participant achieved outcomes 18 as defined by the certified program model. The report shall also 19 describe the types of support services provided, levels of expenditure, 20 and demonstrate how such support services improve participant involve- 21 ment in local projects. 22 § 24. Subparagraph (iii) of paragraph t of subdivision 4 of section 23 3.23 of the parks, recreation and historic preservation law, as amended 24 by chapter 717 of the laws of 1988, is amended to read as follows: 25 (iii) encouraging corps members to continue studies during non-working 26 hours to complete [high school equivalency] an Excelsior diploma or 27 college courses or job skill training; 28 § 25. Subdivision 1 and paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 of section 335 29 of the social services law, subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 819 of 30 the laws of 2022, paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 as amended by section 31 148 of part B of chapter 436 of the laws of 1997, are amended to read as 32 follows: 33 1. Each social services official shall ensure that each recipient of 34 public assistance who is a member of a household with dependent children 35 and is eighteen years of age or older, or who is sixteen or seventeen 36 years of age and is not attending secondary school and has not completed 37 high school or [a high school equivalency] an Excelsior diploma 38 program, receives an assessment of employability based on [his or her] 39 their educational level, including literacy and English language profi- 40 ciency, basic skills proficiency, child care and other supportive 41 services needs; and skills, prior work experience, training and voca- 42 tional interests. This assessment shall include a review of family 43 circumstances including a review of any special needs of a child and 44 whether home visiting services would be appropriate and beneficial for 45 the family. Such assessment shall be completed within ninety days of the 46 date on which such person is determined eligible for public assistance. 47 An applicant for or recipient of public assistance may be assigned to 48 work activities prior to completion of such assessment. 49 (b) Where an assessment indicates that a participant who is not 50 subject to the education requirements of subdivision four of section 51 three hundred thirty-six-a of this [title] article has not attained a 52 basic literacy level, the social services official shall encourage and 53 may require the participant to enter a program to achieve basic literacy 54 or [high school equivalency] an Excelsior diploma or to enter such 55 educational programs in combination with other training activities 56 consistent with the employability plan. S. 5067--B 8 1 § 26. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 of section 335-a of the social 2 services law, as amended by section 148 of part B of chapter 436 of the 3 laws of 1997, is amended to read as follows: 4 (b) Where an assessment indicates that a participant who is not 5 subject to the education requirements of this title has not attained a 6 basic literacy level, the social services official shall encourage and 7 may require the participant to enter a program to achieve basic literacy 8 or [high school equivalency] an Excelsior diploma or to enter such 9 educational programs in combination with other training activities 10 consistent with the employability plan. 11 § 27. Paragraphs (j) and (k) of subdivision 1 of section 336 of the 12 social services law, as amended by section 148 of part B of chapter 436 13 of the laws of 1997, are amended to read as follows: 14 (j) education directly related to employment, in the case of a recipi- 15 ent who has not yet received a high school diploma or [a certificate of 16 high school equivalency] an Excelsior diploma; 17 (k) satisfactory attendance at secondary school or a course of study 18 leading to [a certificate of general equivalency] an Excelsior diploma 19 in the case of a recipient who has not completed secondary school or 20 received such certificate; 21 § 28. Subdivisions 1 and 2 and the opening paragraph and paragraph (a) 22 of subdivision 4 of section 336-a of the social services law, subdivi- 23 sion 1 as amended by section 1 of part X of chapter 56 of the laws of 24 2023, subdivision 2 and the opening paragraph and paragraph (a) of 25 subdivision 4 as amended by section 148 of part B of chapter 436 of the 26 laws of 1997, are amended to read as follows: 27 1. Social services districts shall make available vocational educa- 28 tional training and educational activities. Such activities may include 29 but need not be limited to, high school education or education designed 30 to prepare a participant for [a high school equivalency certificate] an 31 Excelsior diploma, basic and remedial education, education in English 32 proficiency, education or a course of instruction in financial literacy 33 and personal finance that includes instruction on household cash manage- 34 ment techniques, career advice to obtain a well paying and secure job, 35 using checking and savings accounts, obtaining and utilizing short and 36 long term credit, securing a loan or other long term financing arrange- 37 ment for high cost items, participation in a higher education course of 38 instruction or trade school, and no more than a total of four years of 39 post-secondary education (or the part-time equivalent). Educational 40 activities pursuant to this section may be offered with any of the 41 following providers which meet the performance or assessment standards 42 established in regulations by the commissioner for such providers: a 43 community college, licensed trade school, registered business school, or 44 a two-year or four-year college; provided, however, that such post-sec- 45 ondary education must be necessary to the attainment of the partic- 46 ipant's individual employment goal as set forth in the employability 47 plan and such goal must relate directly to obtaining useful employment. 48 When making an assignment to any educational activity pursuant to this 49 subdivision, such assignment shall be permitted only to the extent that 50 such assignment is consistent with the individual's assessment and 51 employment plan goals in accordance with sections three hundred thirty- 52 five and three hundred thirty-five-a of this title and shall require 53 that the individual maintains satisfactory academic progress and hourly 54 participation is documented consistent with federal and state require- 55 ments. For purposes of this provision "satisfactory academic progress" 56 shall mean having a cumulative C average, or its equivalent, as deter- S. 5067--B 9 1 mined by the academic institution. The requirement to maintain satisfac- 2 tory academic progress may be waived if done so by the academic institu- 3 tion and the social services district based on undue hardship caused by 4 an event such as a personal injury or illness of the student, the death 5 of a relative of the student or other extenuating circumstances. Partic- 6 ipation in an educational and/or vocational training program, that shall 7 include, but not be limited to, a two-year post-secondary degree 8 program, which is necessary for the participant to attain their individ- 9 ual employment goal and is likely to lead to a degree or certification 10 and sustained employment, shall be approved consistent with such indi- 11 vidual's assessment and employability plan to the extent that such 12 approval does not jeopardize the state's ability to comply with federal 13 work participation rates, as determined by the office of temporary and 14 disability assistance. 15 2. When a district contracts with a proprietary vocational school to 16 provide vocational educational training to participants, not more than 17 twenty-five percent of the approved duration of the program shall be 18 devoted to preparation for [a high school equivalency] an Excelsior 19 diploma or instruction in English for students with limited proficiency 20 in English. Participants needing instruction in basic literacy shall be 21 referred to basic education programs. Instructors employed by proprie- 22 tary schools to prepare a participant for [a high school equivalency 23 certificate] an Excelsior diploma or for education in English proficien- 24 cy shall meet experience requirements established by the regulations of 25 the commissioner of education. 26 To the extent provided in paragraphs (a) through (d) of this subdivi- 27 sion and if resources permit, each social services official shall assign 28 to appropriate educational activities any participant who has not 29 obtained a high school diploma or its equivalent: 30 (a) In accordance with the provisions of this chapter, any such 31 participant who is under age eighteen shall be required to attend educa- 32 tional activities designed to prepare the individual for a high school 33 degree or [equivalency certificate] an Excelsior diploma. Participants 34 who are not subject to compulsory school attendance requirements may be 35 exempted from the requirements of this paragraph under criteria estab- 36 lished by the department in consultation with the state education 37 department and consistent with federal law and regulations. 38 § 29. Section 97-hhh of the state finance law, as added by section 84 39 of part A of chapter 436 of the laws of 1997, is amended to read as 40 follows: 41 § 97-hhh. [High school equivalency] Excelsior diploma account. 1. 42 There is hereby established in the joint custody of the state comp- 43 troller and the commissioner of the department of taxation and finance 44 an account of the miscellaneous special revenue fund to be known as the 45 [high school equivalency] Excelsior diploma account. 46 2. Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, 47 the state comptroller is hereby authorized and directed to receive for 48 deposit to the credit of the [high school equivalency] Excelsior diploma 49 account, fees established by the commissioner of education and approved 50 by the director of the budget to supplement administration of the 51 [general educational development] tests for the [high school equivalen- 52 cy] Excelsior diploma. 53 3. Moneys of this account, following appropriation by the legislature, 54 shall be available to the state education department for services and 55 expenses related to the administration of the [general educational 56 development] tests for the [high school equivalency] Excelsior diploma. S. 5067--B 10 1 § 30. Subdivision 3 of section 97-jjjj of the state finance law, as 2 amended by section 1 of part VV of chapter 57 of the laws of 2010, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 3. Moneys of this account, following appropriation by the legislature, 5 shall be available to the state education department for services and 6 expenses relating to state assessments of elementary and secondary 7 school students, including but not limited to the [state high school 8 equivalency] Excelsior diploma examination. Moneys of this account shall 9 only be available for expenditure pursuant to approval of an expenditure 10 plan by the director of the budget. 11 § 31. Subparagraph 1 of paragraph d of subdivision 1 of section 3602 12 of the education law, as amended by section 11 of part B of chapter 57 13 of the laws of 2007, is amended to read as follows: 14 (1) Equivalent attendance shall mean the quotient of the total number 15 of student hours of instruction in programs in a public school of a 16 school district or a board of cooperative educational services leading 17 to a high school diploma or [a high school equivalency] an Excelsior 18 diploma as defined in regulations of the commissioner for pupils under 19 the age of twenty-one not on a regular day school register of the 20 district, divided by one thousand. Average daily attendance shall 21 include the equivalent attendance of the school district. For the 22 purposes of secondary school weighting, such equivalent attendance shall 23 be considered as average daily attendance in grades seven through 24 twelve. 25 § 32. Paragraphs a, a-1 and e of subdivision 11 of section 3602 of the 26 education law, paragraph a as amended by chapter 82 of the laws of 1995, 27 paragraph a-1 as amended by section 20-a of part A of chapter 56 of the 28 laws of 2025, paragraph e as amended and such subdivision as renumbered 29 by section 15 of part B of chapter 57 of the laws of 2007, are amended 30 to read as follows: 31 a. School districts and boards of cooperative educational services 32 (BOCES) providing approved programs shall be eligible for aid in accord- 33 ance with the provisions of this subdivision for the attendance of 34 persons twenty-one years of age or over who have not received a high 35 school diploma or [a high school equivalency] an Excelsior diploma 36 recognized by New York State who attend employment preparation education 37 programs provided by such school districts or BOCES, which programs lead 38 to a high school diploma or [high school equivalency] an Excelsior 39 diploma as defined in regulations of the commissioner, even if such 40 persons attend regular day school classes with permission of the board 41 of education; provided that such programs are provided in accordance 42 with a plan of service approved by the commissioner in accordance with 43 the provisions of paragraph f of this subdivision. Such programs may 44 operate between July first and June thirtieth of a school year. Whenever 45 a person enrolls in a program approved pursuant to this subdivision 46 offered by a BOCES or in a school district other than their district of 47 residence, the program provider shall send a notice of such enrollment 48 to the persons district of residence, and shall issue a new notice if 49 such person moves from one district to another. In the event that the 50 cost of a program approved and provided in accordance with the 51 provisions of this subdivision exceeds all sources of funds, other than 52 tax levy revenues, which are available to defray such expenses, the 53 school district or BOCES providing such program shall determine an 54 excess cost per contact hour provided during the base year, and then 55 shall determine the local share of such excess costs for each school 56 district whose residents were served by such program by multiplying such S. 5067--B 11 1 base year hours by the excess cost per contact hour, and such local 2 share shall be a charge against each such district, payable within 3 forty-five days. Notwithstanding the provisions of section nineteen 4 hundred fifty of this chapter, a BOCES shall be authorized to provide a 5 program pursuant to this subdivision in the same manner as a school 6 district. 7 a-1. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph a of this subdivi- 8 sion, for aid payable in the school years two thousand--two thousand one 9 through two thousand nine--two thousand ten, and two thousand eleven-- 10 two thousand twelve through two thousand twenty-five--two thousand twen- 11 ty-six, the commissioner may set aside an amount not to exceed two 12 million five hundred thousand dollars from the funds appropriated for 13 purposes of this subdivision for the purpose of serving persons twenty- 14 one years of age or older who have not been enrolled in any school for 15 the preceding school year, including persons who have received a high 16 school diploma or [high school equivalency] an Excelsior diploma but 17 fail to demonstrate basic educational competencies as defined in regu- 18 lation by the commissioner, when measured by accepted standardized 19 tests, and who shall be eligible to attend employment preparation educa- 20 tion programs operated pursuant to this subdivision. 21 e. Employment preparation education apportionment. In addition to any 22 other aid payable under this section, the apportionment pursuant to this 23 subdivision shall be the product obtained when the employment prepara- 24 tion education hours are multiplied by the aid per contact hour which 25 shall equal the product of the employment preparation program aid ceil- 26 ing and the employment preparation education aid ratio computed to two 27 decimals, rounded, as calculated based on data on file with the commis- 28 sioner on May fifteenth of the base year. Notwithstanding the provisions 29 of section thirty-six hundred nine-a of this part, the payment of such 30 apportionment shall be based upon reports required by the commissioner 31 for the periods ending December thirty-first, and June thirtieth of each 32 school year; payments for the first reporting period shall be made after 33 April first, based on claims on file by March first, provided that the 34 total of all such payments shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the 35 amount for such school year, with the approved amount of such claims 36 reduced on a pro rata basis if necessary; the remainder of any payments 37 due for the first period plus any payments due for the rest of the 38 school year shall be paid after October first, based on claims on file 39 by September fifteenth, provided that the total of such payments shall 40 not exceed the total amount of ninety-six million dollars ($96,000,000) 41 for such school year, with the approved amount of such claims reduced on 42 a pro rata basis if necessary, provided that the total of such payment 43 for services provided to persons who received a high school diploma or 44 [a high school equivalency] an Excelsior diploma recognized by New York 45 state shall not exceed the total amount set aside for such purpose 46 pursuant to paragraph a-one of this subdivision in any such school year, 47 with the approved amount of such claims reduced on a pro rata basis if 48 necessary; and aid paid pursuant to this paragraph shall not be included 49 in the computation of the district expenditure need as defined in such 50 section thirty-six hundred nine-a of this part. The employment prepara- 51 tion education apportionment for the city school district of the city of 52 New York shall be computed only for the city as a whole. 53 § 33. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 54 have become a law; provided, however, that the amendments to section 803 55 of the correction law made by section ten of this act shall not affect 56 the expiration of such section and shall be deemed repealed therewith. S. 5067--B 12 1 Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule 2 or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on its effec- 3 tive date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such 4 effective date.